ja: 織機の結束システム: ダイレクトタイアップ (コード式); 金属チェーン; クイックコネクト/クリップ式; テキソルブコード; ワイヤー/ケーブル; その他
ru: Система соединения ткацкого станка: Прямая подвязь (шнуры); Металлическая цепь; Система быстрого соединения / зажимов; Шнур Texsolv; Проволока/трос; Другое
cs: Systém vázání tkalcovského stavu: Přímé navázání (šňůrové); Kovový řetěz; Systém rychlospojek/klipů; Šňůra Texsolv; Drát/lanko; Jiné
lt-LT: Audimo staklių sujungimo sistema: Tiesioginis surišimas (virvelėmis); Metalinė grandinė; Greitojo sujungimo / segtukų sistema; Texsolv virvelė; Viela / kabelis; Kita
vi: Hệ thống buộc khung dệt: Buộc trực tiếp (dùng dây); Xích kim loại; Hệ thống kết nối nhanh/kẹp; Dây Texsolv; Dây/cáp; Khác
da: Vævbindingssystem: Direkte opbinding (med snor); Metalkæde; Kviklås-/klipssystem; Texsolv-snor; Wire/kabel; Andet
ro-RO: Sistem de legare a războiului de țesut: Legare directă (cu șnur); Lanț metalic; Sistem cu conectare rapidă/clemă; Șnur Texsolv; Sârmă/cablu; Altele
th: ระบบผูกมัดเครื่องทอผ้า: ผูกด้ายโดยตรง (ใช้เชือก); โซ่โลหะ; ระบบเชื่อมต่อด่วน/คลิป; เชือก Texsolv; ลวด/สายเคเบิล; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Sistem vezave na statvah: Neposredni privez (z vrvico); Kovinska veriga; Sistem za hiter priklop/sponko; Vrvica Texsolv; Žica/kabel; Drugo
es: Sistema de amarre del telar: Amarre directo (con cuerda); Cadena de metal; Sistema de conexión rápida/clip; Cuerda Texsolv; Alambre/cable; Otro
pt-BR: Tear sistema de tie-up: Amarração direta (com corda); Corrente de metal; Sistema de engate rápido/clipe; Corda Texsolv; Fio/cabo; Outro
pl: System podwiązania krosna: Bezpośrednie podwiązanie (sznurkowe); Metalowy łańcuch; System szybkiego łączenia/zaciskowy; Sznurek Texsolv; Drut/linka; Inne
zh-CN: 织机踏杆联动系统: 直接连接（绳索）; 金属链; 快速连接/夹子系统; Texsolv 绳索; 金属丝/电缆; 其他
nl: Weefgetouw aanbindsysteem: Directe aanbinding (met koord); Metalen ketting; Snelkoppelings-/clipsysteem; Texsolv-koord; Draad/kabel; Anders
zh-TW: 織布機綁接系統: 直接綁定 (用繩索); 金屬鏈; 快速連接/夾扣系統; Texsolv 繩索; 金屬線/纜線; 其他
pt-PT: Sistema de amarração do tear: Amarração direta (com cordões); Corrente de metal; Sistema de engate rápido/clipe; Cordão Texsolv; Arame/cabo; Outro
bg-BG: Система за връзване на тъкачен стан: Директно връзване (с шнурове); Метална верига; Система за бързо свързване/клипс; Шнур Texsolv; Тел/кабел; Други
tr: Dokuma tezgahı bağlama sistemi: Doğrudan bağlama (kordonlu); Metal zincir; Hızlı bağlantı/klips sistemi; Texsolv kordonu; Tel/kablo; Diğer
ko: 직기 연결 시스템: 다이렉트 타이업(코드형); 금속 체인; 퀵 커넥트/클립 시스템; 텍솔브 코드; 와이어/케이블; 기타
sk-SK: Systém viazania tkáčskeho stavu: Priame priviazanie (so šnúrami); Kovová reťaz; Rýchloupínací systém / so sponami; Šnúra Texsolv; Drôt/lanko; Iné
hu: Szövőszék bekötési rendszere: Közvetlen kötésű (zsinóros); Fémlánc; Gyorscsatlakozó / klipszes rendszer; Texsolv zsinór; Huzal / kábel; Egyéb
en: Loom tie-up system: Direct tie-up (corded); Metal chain; Quick-connect/clip system; Texsolv cord; Wire/cable; Other
it: Sistema di collegamento del telaio: Legatura diretta (con corde); Catena in metallo; Sistema ad attacco rapido/clip; Corda Texsolv; Filo/cavo; Altro
sv: Uppbindningssystem för vävstol: Direkt uppknytning (snöre); Metallkedja; Snabbkoppling/klämsystem; Texsolv-snöre; Vajer/kabel; Annat
fr: Système d’attache du métier à tisser: Attache directe (à cordes); Chaîne métallique; Système d’attache rapide / à clip; Corde Texsolv; Fil / câble; Autre
el: Σύστημα δεσίματος αργαλειού: Απευθείας δέσιμο (με κορδόνι); Μεταλλική αλυσίδα; Σύστημα ταχείας σύνδεσης/κλιπ; Κορδόνι Texsolv; Σύρμα/καλώδιο; Άλλο
fi: Kangaspuiden sidontajärjestelmä: Suora sidonta (narut); Metalliketju; Pikaliitäntä-/klipsijärjestelmä; Texsolv-naru; Vaijeri/kaapeli; Muu
hr-HR: Sustav za vezanje tkalačkog stana: Izravno povezivanje (vezicom); Metalni lanac; Sustav za brzo spajanje / kopče; Texsolv uzica; Žica/sajla; Ostalo
nb: System for vevstolbinding: Direkte oppbinding (med snor); Metallkjede; Hurtigkoblings-/klipssystem; Texsolv-snor; Ståltråd/kabel; Annet
de: Bindungssystem des Webstuhls: Direkte Anbindung (mit Schnur); Metallkette; Schnellverschluss/Clip-System; Texsolv-Schnur; Draht/Kabel; Sonstige